Utah statutes.
17-52-202.   County legislative body initiation of adoption of optional plan
-- Procedure.
(1)  A county legislative body may initiate the process of adopting an
optional plan by adopting a resolution to submit to the voters the question of
whether a study committee should be established as provided in Section
17-52-301.
(2)  Each resolution adopted under Subsection (1) shall require the question
to be submitted to the registered voters of the county at the next special
election scheduled pursuant to Section 20A-1-204 after adoption of the
resolution under Subsection (1).
